Utah statutes.
62A-15-613.   Appointment of superintendent -- Qualifications -- Powers and
responsibilities.
(1)  The director, with the advice and consent of the board and the approval
of the executive director, shall appoint a superintendent of the state
hospital, who shall hold office at the will of the director.
(2)  The superintendent shall have a bachelor's degree from an accredited
university or college, be experienced in administration, and be knowledgeable
in matters concerning mental health.
(3)  Subject to the rules of the board, the superintendent has general
responsibility for the buildings, grounds, and property of the state hospital.
The superintendent shall appoint, with the approval of the director, as many
employees as necessary for the efficient and economical care and management of
the state hospital, and shall fix their compensation and administer personnel
functions according to the standards of the Department of Human Resource
Management.
